Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ST. CROIX CURLING CENTER.new text end new text begin $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the St. Croix Curling Center, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, for the construction of a new community center for winter curling, summer activities, meeting rooms, and community space in St. Mary's Point. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end